Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201849-1456
Committee account;
income; how treated; loans.

(1) Any income received
by a committee on an account consisting of funds or property belonging to
the committee shall not be considered a contribution to the committee but
shall be reported as income. Any interest paid by a committee shall be reported
as an expenditure.

(2) A loan made or received shall be set forth in a separate
schedule providing the date and amount of the loan and, if the loan is repaid,
the date and manner of repayment. The committee shall provide the name and
address of the lender and any person who is liable directly, indirectly, or
contingently on each loan of more
than two hundred fifty dollars.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 56;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 26.